Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-309
Department of Health and Human Services; sole state agency for administration of welfare programs.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall be the sole agency of the State of Nebraska to administer the State Assistance Fund for assistance to the aged, blind, or disabled, aid to dependent children, medical assistance, medically handicapped children's services, child welfare services, and such other assistance and services as may be made available to the State of Nebraska by the government of the United States.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 20, § 7, p. 136;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 68-323;

R.S.1943, § 68-309;

Laws 1951, c. 216, § 1, p. 780;

Laws 1963, c. 388, § 2, p. 1238;

Laws 1965, c. 399, § 2, p. 1280;

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 28;

Laws 1985, LB 249, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 294;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 239.